 "He added, 'We have a rat that is cured of diabetes now, four months old.'"
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical Science Division, warned that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the treatment of diabetes, and points out that these results are not relevant to patients with type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy Nobel Prize in Literature Secretary General Sara Danius publicly announced that the Academy had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan to inform him of the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature award.
 "We're not doing anything right now," Danius said. "I called his closest collaborator and emailed him and got a very nice reply. That's certainly enough for now."
 Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said he started the company when he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage.
 He said he created a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said in 2013 that sales increased after the show's cast members appeared on an episode of Shark Tank in which they rejected the startup's funding request.
 In late 2017, Shimovolos appeared on the shopping television channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competitor ADT.
 One experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality, but no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 ZMapp, which showed promise early on, has been shown in formal studies to have a smaller effect than expected in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation supports the U.S. Olympic Committee's letter and recognizes the absolute necessity of having Olympic officials to help ensure a safe environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the USOC that we can bring about better results for athletes, teams and the sport by seeking meaningful change within the organization, rather than through a departure.
 The U.S. gymnastics team supports an independent investigation into how the victims of Larry Nassar's abuse have been so bravely speaking out and how necessary and appropriate steps can be taken to ensure this never happens again.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Breszinski worked as an adviser to Kennedy and then in the Lyndon Johnson administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 election campaign, and from 1977 to 1981 he served as National Security Advisor to President Henry Kissinger.
 As NSA, he advised President Carter on diplomatic issues such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iran hostage crisis of 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 Starring Emma Stone and Ryan Gosling, the film was nominated in all major categories.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other categories include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing, and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Dreams of Flying" and "City of Stars," were nominated for Best Original Song. Lionsgate Studios received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Donald Trump, the US president, announced on Sunday that US troops would be withdrawn from Syria in a statement released through his spokesman.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey has also said it will protect captured ISIS fighters who have been extradited from European countries.
 This not only confirms the widely accepted theory that some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides details that are generally lacking in fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists have revealed that the top of the feathers were purple and the underside was pale or yellow.
 Such discoveries also provide insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Dinosaur feathers lack the well-developed quill, but have other distinctive feather features, such as barbs and small vanes, and researchers have speculated that these other features later evolved into quills.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation or display. Researchers examined samples from the tail of a young dinosaur and found that the feathers were not from a juvenile, but from an adult dinosaur.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the researchers say that the sample shows that the feathers are not juvenile, but adult.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at a police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 others.
 The governor said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police say they are treating the attack as an act of terrorism and are investigating the Islamic State group, also known as ISIL, as a suspect.
 They found that the sun works in the same way as other stars, by emitting light and by rotating.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation is used to determine the star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in the face of the magnetic reversal.
 During the trip, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by a mad dog in Tibet, nearly married in Nepal and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard operates on both the 2.4GHz and 5.0GHz frequencies.
 If the base station has dual radios, this allows 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g to be backwards compatible.
 802.11n theoretically has a bandwidth of up to 600 Mbit/s, which is considerably faster than the previous standard.
 Duvall, a married man with two adult children involved in the story, did not make a deep impression on Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, "The microphone was talking a lot during the hearing... I was not listening because I was preparing."
 "By 2020, we will make a significant reduction in the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP compared to 2005," he said.
 He did not give a figure, but said the scale of the cuts would be based on China's economic output.
 "Hu urged developing countries to 'break the old habit of polluting first and cleaning up later.'"
 "Hu said, 'This does not mean that we should ask them to bear responsibilities beyond their stage of development and capacity.'"
 The Iraqi Study Group released its report at 12 noon GMT (Greenwich Time) today.
 At this point, there is no guarantee that Iraq's actions will prevent an increase in sectarian warfare or violence, or chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open debate and consensus-building on U.S. policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 First, one of the 78 recommendations is that the United States should adopt a new foreign policy by the end of this year to secure its borders and re-establish diplomatic relations with its neighbors in preparation for hostile Iraqi intervention.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current senator and wife of Argentina's president, announced her candidacy for the presidency last night in La Plata, 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchner announced her presidential candidacy at the same venue, the Argentine Theater, where she began her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of Buenos Aires's delegation.
 After Hurricane Katrina, spending on relief and reconstruction was controversially referred to as "Bush's New Orleans deal" by those who take a conservative view of the national budget.
 Criticism of the reconstruction effort from the liberal side focused on what was known as the Washington insiders who had been awarded reconstruction contracts.
 More than 4 million people have flocked to Rome for the funeral.
 The number of people who attended was so large that most of them could not enter the funeral service that was held in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up around Rome to allow people to watch the funeral.
 In many cities in Italy and in other cities around the world, especially in Poland, similar screens have been installed so that many people can watch.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy cases, such as stolen cars, in order to artificially boost its success rate.
 Congress has allocated funds for anti-obscenity measures since the 2005 budget, and the FBI has been required to assign 10 agents to the adult pornography area.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings best with 41 runs off 41 balls with 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 Middle-order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid scored heavily and put on 100 partnerships.
 However, after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings with 36 runs.
 President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long Asian tour.
 He was welcomed by Singapore Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of defeats in the midterm elections, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed Tuesday to send the government's "clean air act" to all caucus members for review before a second reading, after a 25-minute meeting with NDP Leader Jack Layton at the PMO.
 "Layton, in a meeting with the prime minister, asked for the Conservative Party's environmental legislation to be "radically, comprehensively rewritten," and called for changes to the Conservative Party's environmental legislation."
 When the federal government intervened to take over funding for Mercy Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state governments and some federal MPs accused the move of being part of the federal election campaign in November.
 However, John Howard, the prime minister, said the move was to prevent the hospital from being downgraded by the state government and he has committed an extra $45 million.
 Recent reports have indicated that sea level readings were taken at the time of the tsunami, and that in fact a tsunami did hit near Niue and Tonga.
 No major damage or injuries were reported in Tonga, but the power supply was temporarily cut off, causing the Tongan authorities to miss the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools on or near the coastline closed on Wednesday despite the warning being lifted.
 U.S. President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush's spokesman, Gordon Johndroe, called the North's pledge "a major step forward in achieving the denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 The 10th Atlantic hurricane of the season, Tropical Storm Jerry, formed today in the Atlantic.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Tropical Storm Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain an hour could overwhelm the breached levee.
 The Ninth Ward, which was hit by a 20-foot flood from Hurricane Katrina, is now being inundated by a nearby levee.
 The water flows over a 100-foot-wide dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed dissatisfaction with the deletion in a conversation with Wikinews last month.
 "He lied to us from the beginning, first saying it was all because of legal reasons, and then acting like he was listening to us right up until the moment he deleted it."
 Recent community backlash has led to efforts to draft a policy proposal for the Wikimedia Sites regarding sexual content.
 Although mostly theoretical, the program is designed to simulate the observation of the Draco Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for could have been caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and the dark matter in the halo.
 Just as the moon pulls on the Earth to create tides, the Milky Way pulls on the Sagittarius Galaxy Cluster.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around galaxies is located around them like a halo, and is made up of a large number of small particles.
 TV reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not drink tap water.
 According to Japanese government agencies involved in nuclear issues, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that a container holding uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr Tony Mole found XDR-TB (extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis) in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very difficult to deal with and scary because it has a very high mortality rate.
 Dr. Moll said he believes some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of them were healthy hospital workers.
 In one year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the proportion of XDR-TB among all TB patients does not seem to be very high. At a certain point in time, there were 330,000 TB patients in South Africa, and about 6,000 of them had XDR-TB.
 Weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, the two satellites collided 491 miles above Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion from the collision was huge.
 They are still studying the size of the collision and what effects it will have on the Earth.
 The U.S. Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on a public website.
 The mother of a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh was found dead in the trunk of his car on Wednesday, and authorities in Ohio said they would charge him with aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malaras Balasubramaniam, 29, was found on the side of a road in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb of Cincinnati, wearing only a T-shirt and underwear and was under the influence of drugs.
 She shielded her black Oldsmobile Intri-G with 150 feet of distance from the officers.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, covered with blood-stained sheets.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs, and then by mosquitoes to humans.
 The Indian government has sent pig catchers to affected areas, distributed thousands of mosquito nets and sprayed insecticides in a bid to contain the outbreak.
 The delivery of millions of doses of the vaccine by the government will be a big help in the preparations of health agencies next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas of the world this year have been delayed by funding shortfalls and lower priorities compared to other diseases.
 Slaney moved to Sweden in 1956, and three years later he began working for the Swedish Post Office, where he became chief sculptor.
 He has designed over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 "His work is highly regarded for its quality and detail, and he is one of the few 'names' in the stencil business. There are even people who collect only his work."
 His 1,000th stamp was a 2000 issue depicting the monumental work of David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, 'The Achievements of the Kings of Sweden'.
 He has also been involved in the design of banknotes for other countries, most recently the new $5 and $10 Canadian banknotes, which feature his portrait on the front.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to hospital but died a short time later.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the crash.
 The vehicle was moved from the crash site to Greenwich Mean Time approximately 12:00 on the same day.
 "One man working at a nearby garage said, 'The kids who were waiting to cross the road were all screaming and crying.'"
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in less polluting ways.
 The UN also expects to complete the fundraising for a fund to help countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go to flood-proofing homes, water-resource management, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that some efforts to silence women's voices on women's health have backfired.
 She said she reached this conclusion because of the overwhelmingly positive feedback from women and men who urged that contraception should be considered a medical necessity.
 As the wounded were taken to hospital and the fighting stopped, about 40 inmates refused to go back to their cells and stayed in the prison yard.
 Negotiators tried to sort out the situation, but the demands of the prisoners were not clear.
 Between 10 and 11 p.m. MDT (Mountain Daylight Time), prisoners started fires in the prison yard.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to corner the inmates.
 Firefighters eventually extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal floods that deposited sediment throughout the river were reduced.
 These deposits are essential to the creation of sandbars and beaches that are used as wildlife habitats.
 As a result, two species of fish became extinct, and two others, including the humpback whale, are now endangered.
 The flood will raise the water level a few feet, but officials are hoping the replenishment of the sandbars downstream will help repair the damage.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Geophysics Institute in Jakarta, a quake of magnitude 6.5 or less would not trigger a tsunami warning.
 Despite the absence of a tsunami threat, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey shed tears in her farewell speech, she promised her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell. This is a beginning of another journey."
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections show incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba winning a landslide victory.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also retained a majority in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, while other coalition aircraft were also sent to provide support.
 The collision occurred at a high altitude in mountainous terrain and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rugged terrain.
 Medical charities, Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organization, say this outbreak is the worst ever recorded in the country.
 "Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Veerman said: "Angola is in the worst situation and the situation in Angola is still very bad."
 The game started at 10am in good weather, and apart from a light shower in the morning, it was perfect for a seven-nation rugby tournament.
 The tournament's top seed South Africa made a comfortable start with a 26-0 win over fifth seeds Zambia.
 In the matches against the southern nations, South Africa was completely outclassed, but as the tournament progressed, they improved.
 Well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and excellent teamwork made it obvious to everyone that the team would win.
 Officials at the Amsterdam city council and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with fungus and is in danger of falling, posing a public health risk.
 He was due to be executed on Tuesday but a last-minute court order prevented him from being put to death.
 "All the caves with the name 'Seven Sisters' have entrances that are at least 100 to 250 metres (328 to 820 feet) wide."
 Infrared photos show that the cave is likely to be a cave due to the temperature changes between night and day.
 "They are cooler during the day and warmer at night than the surrounding surface."
 "These thermal behaviors are not as stable as a large cave on Earth that maintains a constant temperature, but they match the deep holes in the surface," said Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University in Flagstaff.
 Voting in France is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed paper ballots into envelopes.
 After the staff verify the voter's identity, the voter places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French electoral law, on the other hand, is extremely prescriptive.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has been made transparent so that voters and supervisors can see that no other envelopes are present other than the one containing the legally counted ballot of the authorized voter at the start of the vote.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe the entire election process. In the evening, volunteers, under the strict supervision of a specific procedure, count the votes.
 Previously released worldwide for cost-cutting and functionality, the ASUS Eee PC became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month in 2007.
 However, since ASUS received the Taiwan Sustainability Award from Taiwan's Minister of the Interior, the market for notebook computers will be rapidly diversified and changed.
 The station's website describes the show as 'a fresh, bold and reckless bunch of traditional radio theatre'.
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet Radio, a torrent-focused site and long-time Internet radio station.
 In late 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary station.
 The show originally featured local East Texans as the amateur announcers.
 When law enforcement officers did not appear in the city of Bishkek, widespread looting continued overnight, it is reported.
 One eyewitness described the situation in Bishkek as "lawless" as people roamed the streets in groups and looted shops.
 Some residents of Bishkek have condemned the illegal actions of the southern protesters.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks of New Zealand in the Rugby Union Tri Nations match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, with the All Blacks winning their 15th straight.
 The Springboks, meanwhile, have lost five games in a row.
 It was the final of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final match of the series will be played at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week, when the Springboks take on Australia.
 The storm hit western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 The US Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center reported no immediate damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 A dead wild duck infected with the deadly avian flu virus H5N1 has been found in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France, the first time the highly contagious strain has been detected in a wild bird in France.
 France is the seventh country in Europe to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of being H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers has accused God of "millions of deaths, destruction and millions of terrorist acts" inflicted on "millions of earthlings".
 "The atheist Chambers claimed that his lawsuit was 'trivial' and 'anyone could sue anyone.'
 "The story of Camille Saint-Saens's opera in France is the story of an artist who lived 'under the dominion of drugs and love for Japan.'"
 As a result, performers are smoking marijuana on stage and encouraging the audience to participate in the theater itself.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann each placed fourth, fifth and sixth, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but he was harsher in his comments about Romney, who had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 Perry said he would "go back to Texas tonight to evaluate the results of the leadership conference and determine if there is a path forward for me in this election," but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 After winning the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann suspended her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 "According to what I know, he is in his 20s. In a statement, Beaver said, "Although I was not at the scene of the tragic incident and I have no direct connection to it, I send my condolences and prayers to the families of the victims."
 TMZ, a celebrity news website, admitted that the photographer had parked his car across the street from the police station and kept trying to take pictures of the police station before crossing the road, and that the California Highway Patrol had twice ordered him to move back.
 Police say the driver of the car that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 With only 18 medals awarded per day, many countries have not been able to get on the podium.
 Yesterday's Super-G included the 9th place of Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands in the women's standing class, and the 10th place of Katja Saarinen of Finland in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Goulburn placed 11th in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Jelínek placed 16th in the men's sitting super-G.
 Mexican skater Ali Belskis finished 15th in men's super-heats, while New Zealand skater Adam Holmes finished 9th in men's super-heats.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska placed 13th in the Super G, while South Korean skier Park Jong-seok placed 24th in the men's Super G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are being blamed for the spread of disease that started near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, UN camps have not properly disinfected waste, allowing bacteria to seep into the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the army came, Haiti had not had a problem with disease since 1800.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti cited an independent study that said UN peacekeepers in Nepal inadvertently spread the disease to Haiti.
 UN disease expert Daniel Lantian said the sudden increase was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr. Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital had admitted a patient in stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak has occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in a variety of jobs on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening with the production of The Simpsons, and hired the show's first writing team.
 He left the show in 1993, but kept the title of executive producer, and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties every season.
 Earlier, China's Xinhua news agency reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the plane was returning to Kandahar after receiving a bomb threat.
 Initial reports said the plane was sent back to Afghanistan after refusing to land at Jarmak.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, both civilian and military, because of the ageing aircraft in the country's fleet.
 International sanctions meant that new aircraft could not be bought.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced its worst air disaster in years when a plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed off the runway at Mashad Airport, killing 17 people.
 Airbus has canceled the remaining concerts of the tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 Lead singer Steven Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, and the tour was canceled.
 Murray lost the first set after the two men traded service breaks.
 Del Potro took the first set, but after 6-6, a tie-break was needed.
 Portis has been rehabilitating his shoulder and was able to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time (1500 UTC).
 Renowned singers from across the country sang the religious hymn, Bajan, in front of Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Sanjusharma opened the evening's proceedings, followed by Jay Shankar Chowdhury. Chhappan Bhog was also performed, with Raju Khandelwal joining him.
 And, Laka Sing led the way in singing the Bajan songs.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (56 different kinds of foods, fruits, nuts, dishes, etc. offered to God in Hinduism) were placed in front of Baba Shyam.
 Laka Sing also performed Chappan Bhog Bajan, which was sung by the singer Raju Khandelwal along with Laka Sing.
 In a keynote presentation at the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata unveiled the controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution game console.
 Similar to a television remote control, the controller uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to move their devices through the air and control their movements.
 Giancarlo Fisichella had to retire from the race after losing control of his car.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had a problem with his front right wheel, which forced him to retire shortly after.
 Michael Schumacher was just a few seconds behind Alonso at the finish line, but he was forced to retire due to suspension damage caused by numerous collisions during the race.
 "According to the tape of the press conference, Jiang said, 'She is very cute and sings quite well.'"
 "I was deeply moved every time I rehearsed this work."
 About three minutes after launch, a large amount of insulation foam was seen falling away from the fuel tank on the onboard camera.
 However, they are not thought to have caused damage to the space shuttle.
 "NASA's space shuttle program manager, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said the foam insulation fell off during "the period of time we were concerned about."
 About five minutes after the fireworks started, the wind suddenly picked up to about 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but it was so hard that it felt like needles. Then it started to hail, and it was so big that it felt like needles. People were screaming and running around. It was crazy.
 "I lost my brother and his friend, and I saw two people in wheelchairs on the way, and people pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that Kashiwazaki Kariwa Nuclear Power Plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Company reported that there was no impact from the earthquake and that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Shika nuclear power plant have been shut down.
 The 9,400 households in the area are said to live without water, and about 100 households without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and train services were suspended in the affected areas, while Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport was closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near the government building two hours later.
 Some reports say the official death toll is eight, while others say up to 30 people were injured, but the final death toll is not yet known.
 Urine samples from deceased pets that had consumed contaminated pet food were found to contain both cyanuric acid and melamine.
 The researchers found that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can block the function of the kidneys.
 The researchers observed that the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid resulted in crystals forming in the cat's urine.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the crystals found in the urine of affected animals when compared with infrared spectroscopy (FTIR).
 You may not know, but most of the goods from Central America enter this country duty-free.
 Even though eighty percent of our goods are taxed through customs in the Central American countries, we treat you.
 That seemed unfair to me. It certainly wasn't fair.
 My message to you is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger has signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 "This bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a '18' rating and imposes a $1,000 fine for selling these games to minors."
 Attorney General, QC, Keir Starmer, said this morning that he was prosecuting both Huhne and Pryce.
 Hoon resigned and will be replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey, a member of Parliament. Norman Lamb, a member of Parliament, is budgeted to take over the business department.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear at Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Ollard, 25, and Zachary Cudback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arms and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider was badly injured in the face and will need reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon failed to hit the fifth man's head, but Schneider suffered constant pain, lost an eye, had part of his skull removed and had his face rebuilt with titanium.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home at the USAF base.
 Carpanedo competed in two individual races in addition to the Wednesday event, the championship.
 Her first race was a slalom, where she didn't make it past the first turn; 36 of the 116 racers had the same result.
 In her other race, the Giant Slalom, she finished 10th in a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 behind the leader, Austria's Claudia Riegler, and 1:09.20 behind 9th-place Hungary's Gundhi Daniel.
 Four female skiers who were sitting in the women's section did not reach the finish line, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the competition were eliminated from the race.
 Madia Pradechi police recovered the stolen notebook and cell phone.
 "D K Arya Deputy Commissioner of Police said, 'We have arrested five men who raped a Swiss woman and also recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrashekar Solanki, the police superintendent, said the accused had come to court with his face covered.
 Three people were in the car when it crashed into the house, but none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the crash occurred was closed temporarily, and emergency services rescued the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first admitted to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is charged with the murder of his son in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is awaiting trial and sentencing, but because of her notoriety, witnesses may have been biased against her.
 This is common practice in the rest of the UK, but Scottish law is different and the court saw the publication of the photographs as potentially harmful.
 Dundee University's Pamela Ferguson said: "If journalists publish pictures of suspects, they are like tightrope walkers.
 The Crown Office, which is responsible for prosecutions, has indicated to journalists that there will be no further comment until the trial.
 According to the leaked document, the border would be based on the pre-1967 lines, which would be in line with Palestinian demands for a border dispute.
 According to reports, other topics include the future of the holy city of Jerusalem for both countries and the Jordan Valley issue.
 Israel demanded that the current troops in the zone remain for 10 years, and the PA agreed that the troops would leave after five years.
 Hunters participating in the additional pest control trials were closely supervised by forestry officers, who monitored and evaluated the effectiveness of the trials.
 The partnership between NPWS and the Australian Sports Shooter Association has resulted in the recruitment of qualified volunteers to assist with the hunting program.
 According to Mike O'Flynn, acting park conservation and heritage manager for NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first operation were all given comprehensive safety and training instructions.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday for the nine-member provisional electoral council (CEP).
 It is Matelli's fifth CEP in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP as part of measures to prepare for new elections.
 In response to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October, a commission was set up by Martelly.
 Some of the violent resistance was sparked by the fact that some elections had not been held since 2011.
 About 60 cases of iPod overheating have been reported, resulting in six fires and four minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 accidents involving the devices.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported an additional 34 cases of overheating.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was "really regrettable" that Apple had postponed the release of its report.
 The quake hit the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Friday).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Office of Homeland Security said no damage was reported nationwide.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a bus in the Philippine capital Manila and took Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Menendez fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, along with the Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an elderly woman needed to use the bathroom, the photographers took her place. Menendez was shot.
 Riggs followed in his father's footsteps and went into medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Dr. Donghan Riggs, who works in a hospital, began to investigate early labor in his spare time.
 His research showed that when hormones were administered, the rate of lung maturation in the fetus was accelerated.
 Xinhua News Agency reported that government investigators retrieved two black box flight recorders on Wednesday.
 Other wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tammy Drymer said, 'Luna was the Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Luna left the world on a full moon night. Just like her, she was very special. She was a strong woman.'"
 "Dustin 'Goldie' Runnells said, 'Luna was as unique as I am... maybe even more unique... I love her and I'm going to miss her... I hope she's in a better place.'"
 A 2010 poll of 1,400 people conducted in the lead-up to the federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had increased by 8% since 2008.
 Julia Gillard, the prime minister, has argued during the 2010 federal election campaign that Australia should become a republic when Queen Elizabeth II's reign ends.
 In a poll, 34 percent said they would like Elizabeth II to be Australia's last monarch.
 A poll found that 29 per cent of respondents thought Australia should become a republic quickly, while 31 per cent said it should not.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100m and 200m freestyle and the Commonwealth Games relay, but his fitness was in doubt due to illness.
 The painkillers needed to get through the race were banned substances, so he couldn't take them.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri State University, has discovered the largest known prime number as of January 25.
 Several people have used various hardware and software to prove the discovery since early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have delivered water to Earth along with organic material that makes up proteins and sustains life.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, because a comet collided with it a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and last month signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors "political nonsense and stupidity."
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that will allow aircraft to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 This is in contrast to the ground-based radar technology used previously, which allowed air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with a much lower degree of accuracy, and provided pilots with less accurate information.
 At Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface trains stopping, and there will be no on-site parking or public transport interchange.
 Concerns over a lack of public transport have led to the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors.
 A study published in the journal Science last Thursday announced the formation of a new species of bird on the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have reported that, despite the fact that the new species evolved in just two generations, the process took much longer because of the breeding between the local species, the Darwin finch, the medium ground finch and the desert finch, which had migrated from the outside.
 Gold can be processed into all kinds of shapes. Even very small shapes can be rolled.
 It can be cut with a thin line, it can be bent or twisted, it can be beaten with a hammer or rolled with a sheet.
 "Gold can be made very thin and can be bonded to other metals. It was used to decorate the hand-painted illustrations in books called 'illuminated manuscripts.'"
 This is called the pH of the chemical, and can be measured using red cabbage juice as a pH indicator.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how acidic or alkaline (alkaline) the chemical is.
 pH level is the amount of hydrogen (H in pH) ions in a tested chemical.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost an electron. (A hydrogen atom consists of one proton and one electron.)
 Dry the two powders together, then wet your clean hands with water and roll the powders into a ball.
 The moisture in your hands reacts with the outer layer to create a fun texture and a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had elaborate sewerage systems and flush toilets in almost every house.
 Housing remains of sewage systems have been found in the houses of Santorini and Minoan cities in Crete.
 Toilets were also used in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In Roman civilization, the toilet was sometimes part of a public bathing area, where men and women used the same facilities.
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 Satellites in space receive the signal and reflect it back almost immediately.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 To put satellites or telescopes in space, you need a huge rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in a remarkable way, the most important change being that it has given us a more convenient and faster means of transportation.
 It brought trains and cars and many other forms of transportation.
 Below that are medium-sized animals such as rabbits, hares, and deer, and medium-sized dogs that hunt them.
 Finally, there are many more small cats (including pet cats) that eat much smaller prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their success is based on the concept of each cat's specialty, which is to exploit a niche that prevents them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of the cat family, living in groups.
 A group consists of one to three adult male members and up to 30 females and their offspring.
 Females are closely related to each other, as they are mostly derived from large matrilineal families.
 Lion prides behave in a way that is remarkably similar to lions (but not to other large cats or dogs), which is also extremely lethal to prey.
 Tigers are like versatile athletes, able to climb high places (albeit not very well), swim, leap long distances, and run five times as fast as a human.
 Tigers are pack animals, like lions, leopards, and jaguars, and only these four cat species can roar.
 The roar of a tiger is different from the roar of a lion, but it is similar to the phrase "roaring words."
 Ocelots are known to eat small animals, preferably those that are much smaller than themselves, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that Ocellot use smell to track and find prey (food).
 Ocelots are active at night, when their eyesight is better and they can move more stealthily. Ocelots hunt by ambushing prey, hiding in the surrounding environment.
 When a small population of organisms becomes separated from its main group (by moving up a mountain or down a river, or by being carried to a new island where they cannot easily move), they often realize that they are in a different environment.
 In these new environments, with different resources and competitors, new populations need different characteristics or adaptations to be competitive.
 The original population has not changed at all, but still needs to adapt as before.
 As time went on and new people began to adapt to the new environment, they began to look more and more different from the others.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two groups would look so different that they could not be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable outcome of evolution and is a crucial part of it every week.
 Plants make the oxygen that humans breathe, and take in the carbon-dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants use photosynthesis to make their own food and also provide shade.
 We build houses out of trees and make clothes out of plants. Most of the food we eat is vegetable. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 The mosasaur was the top predator of its time, so there was nothing to fear except other mosasaurs.
 The long jaw was filled with more than 70 very sharp teeth, and there were additional teeth in the palate, meaning that no one could pass through it.
 It is not clear, but it may have had a forked tongue. It ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and possibly even human flesh.
 This animal attacked anything that came into the water, even the giant dinosaurs.
 Their food was mostly familiar to us, but among the Roman banqueting fare were some unusual and strange things, such as wild boar, peacocks, snails, and dormice.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sat on chairs to eat, while the rich men preferred to recline on couches and eat together, side by side.
 Ancient Roman meals could not have included food that came from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they didn’t eat corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple to all their gods, which they called the 'House of God'.
 People would bring offerings to the gods and priests would try to meet the demands of the gods through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctuary, which was accessible only to the priests.
 Sometimes pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of a temple.
 The very top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely out-of-doors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were simply stalls on the street, and stones were used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In the Norse sagas, they say that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder and sailed westward to discover Greenland, which he named.
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already living there at that time.
 Although each country belonged to the 'Scandinavian' group, there were many differences between the peoples, kings, customs and histories of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think that the back of the Declaration of Independence is a treasure map.
 But that's not true. Even if there's something written on the back of the paper, it's not a treasure map.
 "The back of the Declaration of Independence has the words 'Original Declaration of Independence dated July 4, 1776' written on it, upside down at the bottom of the document."
 No one knows who wrote it, but this large parchment document (75.6 cm x 62.2 cm) was rolled up and stored away early on.
 So it's likely that it was simply labeled.
 The D-Day landings and subsequent battles liberated northern France, but the south remained free.
 "There, the Vichy French were in control. They were Frenchmen who had chosen to collaborate with the Germans in 1940, rather than fight them."
 "On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, an operation called "Operation Dragoon."
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated southern France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people who work and live together in cooperation, a single culture shared by a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, meaning citizen, civis, meaning city or city-state, and civitas, meaning city-state or city.
 Urban States are the pioneers of civilization. Civilization means the transmission of knowledge, the survival and equitable distribution of cultural heritage over generations.
 Many cultures have left no significant historical evidence and are not treated as fully civilized.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen colonies formed a confederation under the Articles of Confederation, which created a weak central government with the Congress as the sole governing body.
 The Congress had no power to levy taxes, and there was no national executive or judiciary, so laws often had to be enforced by cooperative state authorities.
 Congress also had no power to nullify state taxes and tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous approval from all states, and most state delegates, who ignored the central government, boycotted the convention.
 The Italian national football team is the second most successful national team in the world, behind only Germany, and won the 2006 FIFA World Cup.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, roller derby, and F1 racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and occasionally Italian athletes participate in international competitions or the Olympics.
 Japan has almost 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island in the world!
 "Japan's island chain/group of islands is often called the 'archipelago' from a geographical point of view."
 Taiwan began as a name given to the island by 16th-century European sailors, who called it Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, bringing about a change in the production of crops, and hiring Chinese laborers to grow rice and sugar through the system of re-farming.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) army took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan and declared Taiwan to be part of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After the defeat in the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded Taiwan to Japan and allowed Japan to rule the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures: Intiwatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple of the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge of the site have been rebuilt to allow visitors to better understand the original layout.
 In 1976, 30% of the site was restored, and restoration continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35 mm, which was the film size used primarily at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still in production today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio has been inherited by the image sensor format of digital cameras.
 It's a little confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (the simplest integer ratio to get is 12:9) is 3:2.
 Several common formats (e.g. APS format) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline for maintaining order in an image and creating dynamism.
 This law states that the most effective position for a major subject is where the lines of the vertical and horizontal divisions of the image intersect (see example).
 During this period of European history, the wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was thoroughly investigated.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity has bound European nations together despite differences in language and custom.
 Its pervasive power affects everyone from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's tithing funds exist for that very reason.
 The church’s central power has been in Rome for more than a millennium, and this concentration of power and money has raised questions about the legitimacy of the doctrine.
 Immediately after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although these blockades violated international law, as generally accepted by several international conventions of the last two centuries, the strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies.
 The British mined the high seas to prevent any ship from entering any of the maritime zones, thus endangering even neutral vessels.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response in the unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing mood among most citizens and states was pacifism and isolationism.
 Countries that had gone through the horrors and atrocities of World War I prayed that they would never experience such a situation again.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 He (the former manager of his company) brought a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor to Thomas Edison, a copy of his book, and four cents, all his savings, to America.
 In ancient China, there were different ways to represent different eras, each dynasty or family in power was called a "house".
 There were also periods of instability between the various dynasties, the most well-known being the 60-year period between the Han and Jin dynasties, known as the Three Kingdoms period.
 During this period, there was a fierce struggle among the many nobles who contended for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in battles to sit on the highest seat in the Xian palace.
 The adoption of the metric system, the transition from absolutism to republicanism, the rise of nationalism and the idea that the nation is the property of the people and not of one ruler, all had a profound effect on society and politics.
 Also, after the revolution, jobs were opened to all male applicants, opening the way for the most ambitious and success-oriented people to succeed.
 Because of the current ability-based class system, the same system is applied to the military.
 The French Revolution also inspired workers in other countries who were oppressed to take up arms and make their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply concerned with issues that went beyond this worldly life. He often used a cave known as Hira on Mount Noor (Light) for meditation.
 The cave, which has withstood the test of time, is a clear demonstration of Muhammad's religious inclinations.
 Located at the top of one of the mountains in the north of Mecca, this cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's not easy to find it, because once you're inside the cave, you're completely isolated.
 The clear blue sky is visible from the mountains that surround the cave, but nothing can be seen or heard from inside.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exists.
 The Great Pyramid, built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century BC, is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor the dead pharaoh.
 "The Giza Plateau or Giza Necropolis in the Egyptian Valley of the Kings contains several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Sphinx."
 The pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wife and family.
 The "olympia" mark is V-shaped, and the "deme" mark is a square without a staple or floor.
 Drawing is starting from the end of the bow, and releasing is starting from the bowstring.
 The upstroke is usually softer, while the downstroke is stronger and more confident.
 You can draw your own mark with a pencil, but the bow mark on the music sheet is for musical purpose, so it should be kept normally.
 The terrified French king Louis XVI, Queen Marie Antoinette and their two children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles) and the king's sister, Princess Elizabeth, were forced to leave Versailles for Paris on October 6, 1789 by a group of women workers.
 The king and queen returned to Paris surrounded by a crowd shouting and threatening them.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open their carriage windows.
 At one point, a member of the mob waved the head of a royal guard who had been killed at Versailles in front of the terrified queen.
 The cost of the U.S. imperialist war to conquer the Philippines was paid for by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial government to pay for a large part of their expenses, and bonds in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks attracted attention.
 Of course, the super-profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute the basic profit of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must know the background to the creation of the order.
 The period in which the events took place is usually referred to as the High Middle Ages, which corresponds to the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (AD 1000-1300) in European history.
 The Late Middle Ages, which preceded the Early Modern period, and the High Middle Ages, which followed the Early Middle Ages, are conventionally considered to end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a broad term encompassing a range of substantive ideas, from the technologically oriented or technological imperative to the more fundamental idea that human destiny is governed by the laws of science and technology.
 "Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts: that technological development itself has a social influence beyond culture or politics, and that technology does not so much control society as it has a "substantial" influence on it.
 For example, someone might argue that cars have led to the development of roads.
 However, the national road network is not economically viable for a small number of cars, so a new production method is developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Also, many people own vehicles, which increases the rate of road accidents, which in turn leads to new technological advances in the field of medical services to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of cultural determinism, influenced by writers such as Goethe, Fichte, and Schelling.
 From a romantic perspective, geography shaped individuals, and as time passed, the customs and culture associated with that geography grew, which in turn harmonized socially and was better than creating laws arbitrarily and imposing them.
 While Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 The reputation of the city as a centre of luxury began in the 4th century and lasted until the 11th century.
 By the 12th century, Constantinople's status had declined, mainly because crusaders returned with gifts such as silks and spices that were more valuable than the goods sold in the Byzantine market.
 At this time, the fashion capital changed from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style peaked in the period between the 10th and 11th centuries and in the 14th century.
 Initially, the dress was heavily influenced by Byzantine culture of the East.
 However, because the exchange of information was slow, Western styles could be 25 to 30 years behind.
 Late medieval Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest developments of that time was that people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes, as a result of the Crusades.
 Subsistence farming is a type of agriculture in which farmers and their families produce only enough food to meet their own needs.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, organic system that uses the region's native seeds through crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize harvest.
 Historically, most farmers have been subsistence farmers, and this is still valid in many developing countries.
 Subcultures allow similar people who feel marginalized by societal standards to form their own identities.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location and/or gender of the members.
 The defining characteristics of subculture are linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, and geographic elements, and may include any combination of these.
 Members of subcultures often express their sense of belonging through a unique and symbolic style that includes fashion, mannerisms, and specific slang.
 One of the most common ways of demonstrating the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, for reasons of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called feral children. Some feral children are confined, often by their parents, who are unable to accept the child's severe intellectual or physical disabilities.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are claimed to have been raised by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild by themselves.
 When raised by non-human animals, wild infants behave almost exactly like animals that require special care, such as those with fear or indifference to humans.
 Project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and scaffolding takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is more like a tide than a curriculum. It helps people learning new things, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 A metaphor can be both virtual and real, which means that the teacher is a metaphor for a form of scaffolding, but also a little paper clip human of Microsoft Office.
 The virtual structure is built into the software and is designed to prompt, prompt, and explain procedures that students might find difficult to handle on their own.
 The reasons why a child is placed in foster care are as varied as neglect, abuse, and even kidnapping.
 All children should grow up in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment, but that is not the case.
 We consider the foster care system as a safe place for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a caring caregiver, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care should be able to provide all the essential elements that the existing family could not provide.
 The Internet has both a collective communication and a communication element between people.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet lead to an additional dimension in terms of access and satisfaction.
 "For example, 'learning' and 'socialization' have been presented as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 Amey and MacCord (1998) found that 'personal involvement' and 'continuing relationship' were new motivational aspects of the web audience.
 By using video recordings, we were able to make important discoveries in the interpretation of the subtle facial expressions and movements that lasted only a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it claims to be able to accurately interpret subtle facial expressions to detect whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks has shown in his book 'The President's Speech' that people accurately perceive the sincerity of a speech, even when the speaker is unable to understand it due to brain damage.
 He even suggested that animals like dogs have this ability to analyze human behavior.
 Twentieth-century research has shown that there are two hidden or apparent genetic variants.
 Mutations create new genes for a species, and selection removes the expressed genes from the population.
 Separation and recombination mixes the mutations that have occurred in each generation between the two gene pools.
 In the savannah, primates with digestive systems similar to humans have difficulty meeting their amino acid requirements from the available plant resources.
 Moreover, the failure of this leads to serious consequences, such as impaired growth, malnutrition, and eventually death.
 The most readily available plant-based sources are the proteins in leaves or legumes, but these are difficult for us primates to digest without cooking.
 In contrast, animal foods such as ants, termites, and eggs provide high-quality protein with essential amino acids that are easily digested.
 "All things considered, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the 'protein problem' in the same way that chimpanzees in the savannah do today."
 Sleep disturbance is a process of deliberately waking up during a normal sleep period and then falling asleep again after a short period of time (10–60 minutes).
 This can be easily done by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up without fully rousing your consciousness.
 If you turn off your alarm clock while you sleep, you can put the clock in a far corner of the room so that you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological rhythm-based options include drinking a large amount of fluid (especially water or diuretics, which are known to force the bladder to empty) before bedtime and forcing the bladder to empty.
 The amount of equanimity a person possesses is related to the amount of insecurity that is inherent in his body and soul.
 The less you worry, the more positive energy you will have in your life. Everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and satisfaction.
 Everyone can attain enlightenment; the only obstacle to this goal is our own inner anxiety and negativity.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded upon by the Mahayana Buddhist notions of love and many techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple: it consists of kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that embraces all.
 When you practice Kundalini yoga, the Kundalini energy (the energy of awareness) is awakened through the yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and create enlightened states.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy, which led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. The conflict of systems, changes and cultures that followed the end of the war led to the decline of many nations.
 Two years later, the former allies became enemies and the Cold War began.
 The Cold War would last another 40 years, and the proxy wars in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places would be the real fighting.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defences had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat along the Romanian bridgehead and regroup.
 However, these plans were rendered useless when more than 800,000 Soviet troops invaded eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international treaties (bilateral and multilateral) and entered the Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts, creating the Belorussian and Ukrainian Fronts.
 Shipping goods by sea is the most efficient way to move large quantities of people and goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission traditionally has been to transport people and goods, but at the same time to prevent the enemy from doing the same.
 One of the most notable recent examples was the North Atlantic campaign of World War II, in which Americans tried to move manpower and resources across the Atlantic to help the British.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which used U-boats mainly, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany could have conquered Britain as well as the rest of Europe.
 Sheep farming is thought to have begun in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them to easily use their milk, fur, meat and leather.
 Cattle goats are usually kept in herds on hillsides or in pastures, often under the care of a shepherd, usually a child or adolescent, a practice still in use today.
 Machado was built in England in the early 16th century.
 The muleteer had made the road only of parallel planks of wood, but this was better than the rougher road of the time, which enabled the mules to travel faster and carry more loads.
 Sleepers were introduced quite early to fix the track. However, it was found that the track was more efficient when it was on top of a steel sleeper.
 This became a common practice, but the iron wore out the wooden wheels of the chariots more quickly.
 Over time, wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones, and in 1767, the first railroad was finally introduced.
 The first known means of transportation for humans was walking, and it wasn't until 2 million years ago that Homo erectus came along and began to walk upright.
 Their ancestor, Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago, but the best-preserved examples of bipedalism are in the 4.2 to 3.9 million year old fossils of Australopithecus.
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life, and we can also join environmental campaigns, and we can also become activists to reduce the suffering we will experience in the future to some extent.
 This is similar to symptom treatment in many cases, but in order to not just be a temporary solution, the source of the problem must be found and that part disabled.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot with the development of science and technology of human beings, and the problem has become more serious because of the overpopulation and the luxurious lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, the president of the Congress, John Hancock, and the secretary, Charles Thomson, signed it and sent it to the printer John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 During the night, 150 to 200 copies of what is now called the Dandelion Broadside were made.
 On July 8, 1976, the document was first read aloud by John Nixon in the Independence Hall courtyard.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 Dunlap broadsides that are still extant are the oldest surviving copies of this document; the handwritten originals no longer exist.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and have lived on to the present day. We call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make birds look like dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet and claws, lay eggs, and walk on two legs like Tyrannosaurus.
 Most computers in use today use a method of manipulating information through the encoding of binary.
 Binary numbers can have only one of two values (0 or 1), and these numbers are called binary or bits in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not have immediate symptoms. Symptoms like vomiting are so common that they can't be immediately diagnosed.
 The most obvious sign of a poisoning is a container that appears to have been opened and left open, containing medication or household chemicals.
 Check the table for specific emergency instructions for specific poisons.
 The term bug is a term entomologists use to refer to these types of insects with a certain degree of formality.
 The term is derived from the insect known as the bed bug, which is a very suitable parasite for living on a person who has been known for a long time.
 Both the carpet beetle and the bed bug are chronic insects, adapting to the habitat and living quarters of their hosts.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS), the most common neurological disease of young and middle-aged adults, is reported to affect about 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS) is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerves.
 Women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis, according to a new study.
 The couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest or that of the child.
 These couples may choose to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents relinquish their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which is the way most scientific research is done.
 But experiments are about eliminating one or more hypotheses, asking questions, and leading to scientific inquiry.
 Scholars and philosophers focused on classical texts, especially the Latin Bible.
 Psychology and science have accepted Aristotle's view of all matter.
 As knowledge of Greek declined, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many of the rhythms observed in physiology and behavior are critically dependent on the existence of a biological clock and its production of endogenous cycles.
 Most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals, have a cyclical rhythm recorded in their external cycles, not just a response to external cycles.
 The biological clock is a self-maintaining oscillator that can continue to run even in the absence of signals from the outside world.
 Hershey and Chase's experiment was one of the leading studies that suggested DNA is a genetic material.
 Hersh and Chase used phage, or viruses, to insert their DNA into bacteria.
 They did two experiments: one to check for DNA in the pearls when they were radioactive, and one to check for proteins in the pearls when they were radioactive.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the genetic material affected, and whether the affected cells are germ cells.
 Only mutations in reproductive cells can be passed on to children, and mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts people interested in nature exploration for the purpose of viewing scenery, including plants and wild animals.
 Examples of field activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo's Orangutan Island, photos, learning, etc. are one example.
 Every morning, people leave the small town in their cars to go to work, passing the place where they just left, where other people are going to work.
 This dynamic transportation shuttle connects and supports everyone with a car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now scientific data show that this carbon economy, on a vast scale, has thrown the biosphere out of the stable state that helped human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society, uses the transportation system, and almost everyone complains about the transportation system.
 In the developed world, we rarely hear complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transport systems generate such frustrations, and why do they so consistently fail to deliver? Are transport engineers all incompetent? Or is there something more fundamental at work?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles and the interactions they have with each other between two points.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to study traffic flow because drivers' behavior cannot be predicted 100% of the time.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range, so traffic flow has a reasonable degree of consistency and can be mathematically approximated.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three key characteristics were established between (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly. Insect flight ability helped them to escape predators more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back against their bodies.
 This provides them with a larger range of smaller places to hide from predators.
 Today, insects that cannot fold their wings are limited to moths and flies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people believed him to be right about the solar system (and other stars) revolving around the Earth, but many did not.
 It seems like the earth is not moving, doesn't it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest river in the world, and the largest by volume. It carries more than eight times the volume of water of the next largest river.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes reaching a width of 6 miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the earth's rivers into the sea comes from the Amazon.
 The main stem of the Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long, and the basin encompasses some 7,000,000 km2 (2,700,000 sq mi).
 Pyramid building continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, but in size and technical excellence it could never match the Pyramids of the Fourth Dynasty.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom marveled at the monumental architecture of their ancestors, which was more than 1,000 years old by their standards.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, the smallest independent state in the world and the smallest country by population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most people who work in the region, unlike Latin, which is used more frequently in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, and copper since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in their natural form and are relatively simple to extract with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was similar to the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas and plasma (in that order), but Aristotle also theorized that they were changing into new elements that make up what we see.
 An alloy is basically a mixture of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Elements such as calcium and potassium are considered metals, although there are metals such as silver and gold.
 There are also alloys that contain small amounts of non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that a few dozen of them could fit inside the period at the end of this sentence.
 Thus, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, the advent of newer writing styles has led to less use of pencils and they have been pushed to the back of the line.
 Now people don’t need to get close to a pencil sharpener to write messages on a computer screen.
 People are wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is created.
 Nuclear fission bombs are based on the principle that a large amount of energy is required to bring together a large number of protons and neutrons to form a nucleus.
 It's like pulling a heavy wagon up a hill. When you split the nucleus again, some of that energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, meaning that they tend to split on their own, with very little outside influence or no outside conditions at all.
 "The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust, and the outer layer of the Moon is called the 'crust.'"
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the bottom.
 Crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the Highlands.
 The crust is thinner, so there may be more maria near the surface, where it is easier for lava to rise.
 Content theories focus on what causes people to behave in a certain way or leads them to behave in a certain way.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs or desires that are internalized by the time they become adults.
 These theories look at who certain people are and what in their environment makes them want to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's Two-Factor Theory.
 Typically, two behaviors can emerge as a manager begins to lead his or her former peers: one at the end of the spectrum, trying to remain "one of the guys," and the other at the other end, trying to be "one of the bosses."
 Managers of this type are not well-liked by their people, who experience them as making unpopular decisions, imposing disciplinary action, assessing performance and assigning responsibility, and being difficult to hold accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the unconscious individual thinks that the team should change everything and do it his own way.
 Ultimately, the success of a team is the responsibility of the leader.
 Such behavior causes confusion among the team leader and members.
 Virtual teams maintain the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real members.
 They often have more autonomy than the traditional team members because they can meet with teams at any time of the day, which is not always understood by the local management team.
 The existence of the "true" "transparent team" (Lason and Rapoport, 1989, 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The ""invisible team"" is the management team that each member reports to. This team sets the standards for each member."
 Why do organizations take so long to establish learning communities? One goal of implementing a structured learning concept is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in an organization's business units, creativity and originality can flourish.
 As a result, the process of organizations working together to overcome obstacles can lead to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create an innovation culture as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) describes the Continuum approach as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provides the necessary physical evidence when taking a theoretical approach to the study of cognitive abilities, narrowing the field of study and making it more precise.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior helps scientists in their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, lesions, tumors, and other conditions can affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions.
 The advent of new technologies has allowed us to observe and investigate brain structure and processes that were previously unobservable.
 This provides a lot of information and data for us to create a simulation model that helps us understand the inner workings of the mind.
 AI conjures up images of science fiction, but it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes work to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 For example, it includes functions for writing, voice, face recognition, as well as control, planning, scheduling and customer diagnosis and answering questions.
 These things have become a separate discipline that focuses on providing solutions to problems that occur in real life.
 AI systems are now frequently used in the economic, medical, engineering and military fields, as seen in many home computers and video game software.
 Field trips are a big part of every class. Teachers generally want to take their students to places that do not require a bus ride.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips. Students can view museum exhibits from the comfort of their classroom, view an aquarium, and view beautiful works of art.
 Virtual field trips are a great way to look back on field trips and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year Bennett School students from North Carolina design a website about a state trip, and each year the website is redesigned and the previous version is archived on an online server.
 Blogging can also help improve students' writing. Students often start blogs with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers generally forces them to change.
 Since most students are the most critical audience, blog writers begin to try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 "Blogs also serve to "engage students in their own learning" and "to make students more literate and interesting" (Totoki, 2004).
 Blogging encourages collaboration and helps students to extend their learning beyond the traditional school environment.
 "The proper use of blogs is to "respond actively to Internet resources, thus promoting the analytical and critical thinking of students and allowing them to define their own position in the writings of others and to establish their own views on a particular subject (Oravec, 2020)."
 Ottawa is Canada's charming capital city, where the use of two languages is a part of the charm, and the city's diverse art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 In the south, there are the Niagara Falls, and in the north, the untamed beauty of Muskoka and other unspoiled areas.
 All of these things make Ontario stand out as the true Canada to outsiders.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: African Americans living in the United States are more numerous than Canadians.
 The islands of East Africa lie along the eastern coast of Africa and are located in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent or associated with France and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Islam was also introduced by the Arabs, and there was a great change in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 The north is bordered by the Sahara Desert, the south and west by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Female: All female travelers are encouraged to answer married, regardless of whether they are actually married.
 Wearing a ring can also help (but expensive-looking rings are best avoided).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can result in what is perceived as harassment and that acts such as touching a woman's arm are not uncommon.
 Don't be afraid to say no to men and stand up for yourself (whether it's a cultural difference or not, harassment is unacceptable!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century by Berber fishermen, and was later used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merinids.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, but after the 1755 earthquake they abandoned it.
 The Moroccan sultan rebuilt the city of Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish traders who settled here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, it is easy to find places selling traditional Moroccan products such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and a variety of goods, but all of them are for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the east of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, especially the roads of the town, including the city center.
 Goma is quite safe, but if you are visiting Goma from outside the province, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in North Kivu.
 The city is also the base for some of the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking and climbing of the Nyiragongo volcano in Africa.
 You can get around Goma using a moto-taxi (motorcycle taxi). The regular (local) fare is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 Combining the meaning of 'impossible' and 'relative approach', 'Timbuktu' has come to be used as a metaphor for a far-off, exotic place.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor town, but it has become a tourist attraction because of its fame and has an airport.
 Due to the effects of desert sand, in 1990 Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 This was one of the most prominent explorations in Henry Louis Gates' PBS special, "African Odysseys."
 The city is more Arabic than African, in contrast to other Malian cities.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeastern part of South Africa, bordered by the Limpopo River to the north, the Crocodile River to the south and the Mozambique and Zimbabwe borders to the east and west respectively.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different zones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's flagship parks, managed by the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 Like all South African national parks, there is a conservation levy and entrance fee to the park.
 It may be worthwhile to purchase a wild card to enter specific parks in South Africa or the entire South African National Parks system.
 Hong Kong Island is where the territory of Hong Kong was named after and where many tourists focus on.
 The skyscraper line of Hong Kong is likened to a sparkling graph, because the buildings line the water of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views in Hong Kong, head to the Kowloon waterfront, across the harbour from Hong Kong Island.
 Most of Hong Kong's land reclamation has taken place along the northern coastline.
 This is where British colonial developers made their mark, so if you're looking for evidence of the former colonial territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest continuous mangrove forest, stretching 80 km (50 mi) from the coast of Bangladesh to the Sundarbans National Park in India.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO World Heritage Site and a part of the forest within the Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 This forest is not just a simple mangrove swamp. It is part of the last remnant of the great jungle that once covered the Gangetic Plains.
 The Sundarbans covers an area of 3,850 km² of which about one third is covered by water and swamp.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans is a wildlife sanctuary. It is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area.
 Buses run all day from the inter-city bus station (across the river), but buses to the east and to Jakarta/Bandung only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 The buses are often full, so it is best to buy a ticket in advance a few days before.
 Comfortable and sturdy minibus shuttles run in most areas.
 Shared taxis are a quick and convenient way to travel to nearby areas, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The bridge over the Oyapock River is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the city of Oiapoque in Brazil with Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 m high, the bridge is 378 m long and has two 3.50 m wide lanes.
 The vertical clearance under the bridge is 15 metres, and construction was completed in August 2011, with the bridge closed to traffic until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the construction of the Brazilian customs inspection station is completed.
 The Guaraníes are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay, and were semi-sedentary hunter-gatherers who also practiced agriculture.
 The Chaco region was the home of other indigenous peoples such as the Guayqueríes and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, known as the "Land of the Giants" in the 16th century, was the result of a clash between Spanish conquerors and indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish began a three-century colonial period.
 Since the founding of Asunción in 1537, Paraguay has retained a great deal of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Grounds in Las Canitas.
 It is also possible to watch smaller tournaments and matches here at other times of the year.
 For tournament news and ticket information for polo matches, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), which is equivalent to 1 British pound (GBP).
 FIC West store is located right across the street from Stanley, the island's only bank.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands, and American dollars and credit cards are also widely accepted.
 British and US currency are accepted in the area, but credit cards are not. Please check with the owner in advance to determine what forms of payment are accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the Falkland Islands pound outside the islands, so exchange it before you leave.
 Montevideo is located on the southern edge of the Equator, so when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is a subtropical region, with temperatures of around 30°C in summer.
 Winters can be incredibly cold, with temperatures dropping below freezing on occasion, but the wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than it actually is.
 There is no "wet season" or "dry season" as such, and rainfall is fairly even throughout the year.
 While many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, they still retain their wildness and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to park officials, you must be at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves, and at least 25 yards/meters away from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may appear, elephants, elk, moose, bears and almost all large animals can attack.
 Dozens of visitors are injured each year by not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and dangerous, so keep your distance.
 Additionally, the smell can attract bears or other wildlife, so you should keep food smelling and cooking free of camp.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is on the island of Upolu and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was established in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British ships sank, killing about 200 Americans and Germans.
 The period of the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, was marred by a peaceful gathering in the village which resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland has two harbours, so there are plenty of beaches, the most popular of which are within three areas.
 North Shore Beach (North Harbour) is on the Pacific Ocean, stretching from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It is a safe swimming beach on almost all sandy beaches, and most beaches have plenty of shade provided by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located at the Waitemata Harbour, in the suburb of St Heliers, between Mission Bay and the central city of Auckland.
 These beaches are mostly family beaches, with a variety of shops along the coastline, and are safe for swimming.
 The main local beer is Number One, which is a refreshing, light beer with no complex flavours, and another local beer is Manta.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easily available.
 Local tap water is safe to drink, but bottled water is readily available if you are concerned.
 The concept of 'flat white' coffee is unfamiliar to Australians, who are used to 'espresso' as a short black and cappuccino as a creamy (not frothy) affair, with tea served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juice is expensive but very tasty.
 We make many trips to this reef area throughout the year, but we rarely see injuries caused by these causes on the reef.
 Still, you should listen to the advice of the officials and pay close attention to all the signs and safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish occur from October to April, near beaches and estuaries, and occasionally outside these areas.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people, most of them are afraid of people and swim away.
 The sea crocodile does not live in the sea, but mainly in the rivers north of Rockhampton.
 By booking in advance, travelers have a sense of security that there will be a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents often have deals on specific hotels, but you can also book other types of accommodation, such as camping sites, through them.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport pickup/transfers, and a simstay flight and hotel.
 We also hold reservations for customers who need time to decide or who need time to obtain other documentation (e.g. visas) for their destination.
 However, if you have any changes or requests, you should not contact the hotel directly, but should go through the travel agency first.
 At some festivals, many people who attend the music festival decide to camp there, and most attendees think it is a must-experience.
 To be close to the fun and excitement, you should get there early and secure a campsite near the music.
 Although the main stage may be over, don't forget that there's still music to be heard all over the festival until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 When crossing the North Sea in winter, the ship passes through a lot of ice and the noise is quite horrible, so it is better to check the location of the rooms.
 The St. Petersburg cruise includes time in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check the terms and conditions).
 Casinos generally make every effort to maximize the time and money spent by their patrons, and this can include no windows or clocks, and making it difficult to find the exit.
 They always have special food, drinks, and entertainment to keep visitors coming back and to keep the good vibes going.
 Some places even offer free drinks. But alcohol blurs your judgment, so good gamblers know the importance of not getting drunk.
 When driving over high altitudes or mountain roads, you should consider the possibility of snow, ice or sub-zero temperatures.
 On icy or snow-covered roads, the friction is reduced, so you can't drive as well as you would on a dry asphalt road.
 Snowstorms can drop a lot of snow in a short time, and feet can get stuck.
 It can also be limited by snow or rain falling or blowing in the wind, or by dirt on the windshield.
 In contrast, many countries have icy or snowy roads that are a part of everyday life, and the roads are not blocked for most of the year.
 The safari is probably the most spectacular tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari, which is widely known, refers specifically to overland travel to view the magnificent wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannas.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, have a tendency to approach cars closely and can be observed well using standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs and leopards are sometimes shy, so binoculars make it easier to observe them.
 "Hiking safari ("Bushwalking", "Hiking safari" or "Walks" also) consists of hiking for several hours or days."
 The Paralympic Games will be held from 24 August to 5 September 2021, with some events taking place in multiple locations across Japan.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 Summer Olympics, will be the only city in Asia to have hosted the Summer Games twice.
 If you booked your 2020 flights and accommodation before the announcement, you may be in a bit of a pickle.
 Refund policies vary, but as of the end of March, most of the refund policies for the Olympics in 2020 have not been extended beyond July 2020.
 Most event tickets are priced between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, with the average ticket price around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels have ironing boards and irons available for rent, even if they are not provided in the room.
 You may not have an iron or like to wear ironed socks, in which case you can use a hair dryer.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (it may shrink or discolor).
 There are other ways to purify water, some of which are more effective against certain contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute of boiling water is enough, while in others, it may take several minutes.
 Water filters vary in effectiveness, and in areas of concern, it is recommended to purchase bottled water from a reputable brand.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not common in their own region.
 Pests can spoil food, cause inflammation or, worse, cause allergic reactions, spread toxins or spread disease.
 The disease itself, or a dangerous animal that can injure or kill a person by force, is not usually considered a pest.
 Duty-free shopping provides an opportunity to buy goods that are exempt from taxes and excise duties in certain areas.
 Travelers from countries with high taxes can sometimes save a significant amount of money, especially when buying alcohol or cigarettes.
 The road between Point Marion and Fairmont, located in a remote mountainous area, is known as one of the most difficult to drive on the Bypass.
 If you are not used to driving in the countryside, you should be careful of steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than on the previous and following sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km/h) - and compliance with it is much more important in this section than in the others.
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route, such as at Pennsylvania Furnace.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to their southern neighbors, Austria, with lots of butter and variety.
 Fruit pastries are common, with apples being used year-round in pastries, and cherries and plums being used mostly in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes are especially good with strong coffee and especially well.
 If you want a small, flavorful loaf, try a local version of the berliner, pancakes, or krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a dish that is based on medicinal plants and spices, with meat or vegetables as a side dish.
 "Curry can be ""thick"" or ""thin"" depending on the amount of water used."
 In the interior regions of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in southern India and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian food is a comprehensive term that encompasses the various regional cuisines of the country's 17,000 islands.
 However, when used without qualification, the term tends to refer to the food of the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now widely available throughout the archipelago, the Javanese cuisine is characterized by a variety of simple seasonal dishes, the main flavors of which are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar) and various spices.
 The saddle is a seat for a rider, which is supported by the horse's back.
 This device gives the rider a lot more stability, but it can be a safety issue because the feet can get caught.
 If a person riding a horse falls off and gets their foot caught in the stirrup, they can be dragged along by the horse. There are several safety precautions that can be taken to minimize this risk.
 First, most riders wear a saddle with a high pommel and a narrow, close-fitting saddle.
 Next, some saddles, particularly those in the UK, have a safety strap that can be used to keep the girth from falling off the saddle if the rider falls backwards.
 Cochamó Valley - The best climbing area in Chile, known as the South American Yosemite Valley, with a variety of granite walls and rocky mountains.
 The mountain tops have breathtaking views from the peaks. Climbers from all over the world continue to seek new paths in the natural world with unlimited potential.
 Ski and snowboarding are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or snowboards attached to your feet.
 "Skiing is a form of recreation and sport in which people use skis to glide on snow. Skiing can be recreational, utilizing ski lifts, or competitive, using alpine skiing or cross-country skiing."
 The idea of skiing is very old. Cave paintings depicting skiers date back to 5,000 years ago.
 Skiing as a sport dates back at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club was founded in 1861 by Norwegian settlers in Australia.
 Skiing: This activity is also known as backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 These activities are related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually do not include them, and in the latter case are done on steep terrain and require much harder skis and boots.
 Think of a ski course as a similar hiking course.
 On good conditions you can go a little further than walking, but without a well-maintained track and heavy backpack you will not be able to go as fast as in cross-country skiing.
 Europe is a continent with relatively few independent countries, but traveling between them usually means going through multiple visa applications and passport checks.
 The Schengen zone, however, works more like one country in this respect.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can normally cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, having a Schengen visa means that you do not need to apply for a visa individually to each Schengen country, which saves you time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of antiques. In some countries, anything over 100 years old is considered an antique.
 North America has a geographic difference that makes it seem younger than Europe, in that it has a shorter definition of antiques.
 Handcrafted items may not be as durable as mass-produced counterparts, but they can still be defined as antiques.
 Reindeer herding is one of the Sami people's main livelihoods and in trade, such culture is also important to many other people.
 Traditionally, not all Sámi have been involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, but most have lived by herding reindeer as draft animals, fishing and hunting.
 Today, many Sami people are involved in modern trade. Tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sápmi.
 It is widely used in non-Romany, especially in the media, but it is often considered offensive and inaccurate because it perpetuates negative stereotypes and misconceptions about the Roma people.
 If the country you are visiting becomes a travel alert area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You may want to hear the government's opinion instead of your own, but the advice of each country's government is tailored to its own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alert is just a brief summary of the political situation in one country.
 The views presented are mainly superficial, general, and oversimplified, compared with more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any hazardous meteorological condition that may cause damage, disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types depending on the region, terrain and atmospheric conditions.
 Windstorms, hail, extreme precipitation, and wildfires are forms and effects of adverse weather, such as a blizzard, a tornado, a waterspout, and a cyclone.
 Local and seasonal adverse weather events include blizzards, snow squalls, hail, and dust storms.
 Travelers should look up the local weather before they go to avoid any travel disruptions.
 Anyone planning to visit a country considered a war zone should be sure to receive specialized training.
 An Internet search for 'hostile environment course' will probably give you the local company's address.
 The lectures generally cover much more detail on all the issues discussed here, and are usually accompanied by practical experience.
 The course is usually 2-5 days long and involves role-playing, various first aid procedures, and occasionally weapons training.
 Books and magazines about wild survival are common, but there are very few publications about war zones.
 Travellers planning gender reassignment surgery abroad should ensure they have valid documentation when they return.
 Whether a passport is issued with an X for gender or whether the person is able to change the gender on their documents varies from country to country.
 The willingness of foreign governments to accept these documents is also very variable.
 Since 9/11, airport security screening has become much more of a hassle.
 Transgender people before surgery should not expect to pass the scanner just because their privacy and dignity are intact.
 Rip currents are often caused by waves breaking on reefs or other underwater obstacles.
 Due to the systematic stratification of the underwater system, the return water is concentrated in some deep places, which can form from rapid currents to deep water.
 Most of them die of exhaustion after trying to swim against the current, which is mostly impossible.
 If you stay away from the currents, it is not difficult to swim back to shore as usual.
 You may want to try to find a place where you won't be swept back into the current, or you may want to wait for rescue depending on your swimming ability or whether you are found by someone else.
 Re-entry shock occurs more quickly than culture shock, lasts longer, and can be more severe, because there is no honeymoon period.
 Travelers who have not had any difficulty adjusting to a new culture often have a particularly hard time adjusting to their own culture when they return.
 When returning to their home country after living abroad, they may find themselves adapting to the culture of the country they are returning to, while at the same time losing some of the habits of their own culture.
 When you first went abroad, you knew that travelers had to adjust to a new country, so most people were patient and understanding.
 People may not think that patience and understanding are needed for travelers who are returning home.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see the pyramids in silence before the show starts.
 You always hear the voices of tourists and vendors, and the story of light and sound is like a storybook.
 SpongeBob is set up as the background and narrator of the long story.
 Scenes were projected on the pyramids, and fire was projected on other pyramids.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and, in 2020, 16 countries have bases there.
 The system is located about 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula, the largest of which is King George Island, where the Villa Las Estrellas base is located.
 The other is Livingston and Deception Islands, which are still active volcanoes and offer a natural harbor with a spectacular caldera filled with water.
 Ellesmere Island is located on the southern edge of the peninsula and is bordered by the Baffin Bay.
 Here the land rises into a plateau, then recedes again to form a 360-kilometre-long belt of the Eldsberg Mountains, which are divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The Northern Region or Centennial Mountains contain the highest mountain in Antarctica, Mount Vinson, which is 4,892 m (16,080 ft) high.
 If you are in a remote area where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones cannot usually replace cell phones because they must be used in places where the satellite and the ground station are in direct line of sight.
 The service is frequently used in maritime transportation, including leisure vessels, and where voice and data services are required.
 For this service connection, you will receive more information from your local telephone service provider.
 The gap year is becoming increasingly popular among people who travel and study.
 This is especially popular with graduates, who can take a year out of their studies without it being a huge burden on their studies.
 In most cases, enrolling on a gap-year course abroad can actually increase your chances of gaining a place at higher education back home.
 Generally, there is a registration fee to enroll in these training programs.
 "Finland is a good place to enjoy boating. "The Land of a thousand lakes" has thousands of islands on its lakes and coastal archipelagos."
 The islands and lakes do not require a yacht.
 Although the coastal archipelago and the large lakes are large enough for any yacht, it is also an experience to go a little smaller, even in a kayak.
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with one boat per seven to eight people.
 This is similar to cases in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is quite unusual outside these countries (one in 40 in New Zealand).
 Certainly, most Baltic cruises offer a long stay in Russia's St. Petersburg.
 This means you can spend a couple of days exploring the historic city during the day and then return to the cruise ship for the night.
 If you are going to the coast by sea, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruises advertise Berlin, Germany, but as you can see on the map above, Berlin is not near the sea and visiting the city is not included in the cruise price.
 Flying can be a scary experience for anyone, especially if you've never been on a plane before or are afraid of flying.
 This is not something to be ashamed of, and is no different from the personal fears, disgusts and aversions that most people have for other things.
 For some people, understanding how an airplane works, and what happens during a flight, or overcoming fears that they are not in control, can help.
 Courier companies are paid a lot of money to deliver things quickly, and often time is of the essence when it comes to business documents, emergency repairs or spare parts.
 Large companies use their own aircraft on some routes, but for other routes or small companies, there is a problem.
 If you have sent it by air freight, some routes may take several days to clear customs and collect your baggage.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage, which airline regulations do not allow without a passenger on board.
 The only sure way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money to be privileged (or have your company pay for you).
 So it's not cheap - it could cost you up to four times the price of a business class ticket or up to 11 times the price of a first class ticket!
 Generally, a direct flight from Area A to Area B, whether in business or first class, is not worth the effort of trying to get a seat discount.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. The language is Romanian, but Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic strife.
 The 1994 conflict created the Transnistria Republic, a self-declared republic with its own government and currency, but not recognized by any UN member state.
 Although political negotiations between the two Moldovan states broke down, economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Eastern Orthodoxy.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million and is the second largest port and a very good transportation hub after Istanbul.
 Once an ancient city, Smyrna is now a modern, developed, bustling commercial center surrounded by mountains and a huge bay.
 The city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey, but amidst the wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, and modern shopping centres are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets and old mosques and churches.
 In the village of Haldarsvik, you can see the nearby island of Eysturoy, and there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard are some interesting marble sculptures of doves on several tombs.
 It's worth spending 30 minutes exploring this interesting town.
 To the north is the easily accessible, romantic and enchanting town of Sintra, a city famous with foreigners for its praise of the splendour recorded by Byron.
 The Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, to the north is the world-famous Shrine of Our Lady of the Pillar, the site of the Virgin Mary's apparition.
 Remember that this is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great significance to a significant part of the world's population.
 There are still many people living here, many more who have been killed here, or who have died here, working, whether they were Jewish or not.
 Please show respect, dignity and courtesy to the place. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not scratch or deface the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Half of the population prefers to use Catalan, the majority understands it and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most signs are only in Catalan, the official language established by law.
 However, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but in the event of an unscheduled interruption, the system automatically switches to Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 "This is usually a misconception, but the best way to live in Paris is to behave like a ""bien élevé(well-bred)"" person. This will make your life easier."
 The Parisian's brusque exterior will quickly disappear if you show them basic courtesy.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is mostly covered with dense forests of beech, hornbeam, fir and Mediterranean plants.
 The wide range of microclimates, different soils and different elevations result in a wide range of plant species.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, rare animals such as the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, snake, wild cat and large hare are found, as well as many more common species.
 During a visit to the monastery, women are required to wear a skirt that covers their knees and their shoulders are to be covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a cover that can be pulled down for women visitors who have not brought their own, but if you bring a brightly colored cover, you will be greeted with a smile at the entrance by the monks or nuns.
 Along the same lines, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 You can rent them at the entrance, but since not everyone washes them after each use, it can be uncomfortable to wear these kimonos. One size fits all men!
 Like the food of the Mediterranean, the food of Majorca is based on bread, vegetables, meat (especially pork) and olive oil.
 A simple, and particularly summery, evening meal is a baguette with a simple dressing of easily available ingredients such as cheese, tuna, tomato and olive oil.
 All nouns that are used with the word Sie, meaning you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and nouns.
 It is a bit more complicated to find out whether a verb or adjective is used in the form of a noun, but it is certainly easier to read.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main letters to watch out for are c and g, as they vary depending on the vowel that follows them.
 You also have to pronounce r and rr differently. Caro means dear, but carro means cart.
 Persian is relatively easy and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar introduction will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the phrases.
 It goes without saying that if you know some romance languages, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is so similar to Spanish that it is not worth learning separately.
 Pre-modern observatories are mostly obsolete today and are used as museums or educational sites.
 In their day, light pollution was not at the same level as it is today, so they were located in places that were easily accessible, such as cities and campuses, unlike today's observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The cherry blossom viewing event, known as Hanami, has been part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 This concept is derived from China, where peach blossoms are chosen as part of the culture.
 The first cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace in Tokyo. Only the Emperor and the aristocrats participated in this party.
 "Plants look best in their natural environment, so the temptation to take just one specimen is one that should be resisted."
 "If you visit a formally laid out garden to collect 'specimens', you are bound to be chased away."
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, very convenient to move around, and almost everything can be bought after you arrive.
 "But if you are in the ""hot"" zone, which is a few degrees north of the Equator, you will have to deal with high temperatures (always hot) and strong sun (rarely clear)."
 There are also buses to Hebron, where the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives, are traditionally buried.
 You must make sure that the bus you are getting on is not going to Kiryat Arba, a Jewish town near Hebron, but to Hebron itself.
 Inland waterways can be a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or take a cruise on the Danube River or a boat ride along the Seine.
 They also have popular hiking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions surrounding the holiday have become universalized to non-Christian and non-Christian people around the world.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter to watch the sunrise.
 Of course there is a Christian theological explanation for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 More traditional churches hold Easter Vigils on Saturday nights of Holy Week, where the faithful often celebrate the Resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that first arrived on the island arrived on the island either swimming, flying, or floating.
 Mammals were unable to travel as far from the mainland as the Galapagos's primary grazers, the giant tortoise.
 Since humans arrived on the Galapagos, many mammals, including goats, horses, donkeys, rats, cats and dogs, have been introduced to the islands.
 If you visit the polar regions in winter, you will experience the polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 The sky is dark all day long, so it offers a good opportunity to see the aurora.
 The area is not densely populated, so light pollution is not a problem, and it is possible to enjoy the stars in the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than Westerners.
 Suits are the standard of business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by first name or title.
 In the workplace, teamwork is so important that the collective effort is emphasized over individual performance.
 Workers must get their boss's approval for any decision they make and must follow their boss's instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.2967855551055944, 'precisions': [0.6332986038758075, 0.36574859678893096, 0.23708524873697145, 0.15945417243189083], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9701968369343567, 'length_ratio': 0.9706322559767, 'translation_length': 23995, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.368925752352155, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}